Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325G.38] HANDHELD ELECTRONIC DEVICES; DISCLOSURES. new text end new text begin If a retail establishment offers consumers the use of handheld electronic devices that require payment for games or other entertainment, the handheld electronic device must display a disclosure. The disclosure must be provided to the consumer before a game or entertainment is purchased and must: new text end new text begin (1) require the user to affirm that the user is 16 years of age or older; and new text end new text begin (2) display the payment amount required in at least ten-point font and in text that is larger than all other text viewable on the screen at that time. new text end